Illinois, session 104th, SB1240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Mandates Act is amended by changing 5Sections 6 and 8 and by adding Section 9.2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 805/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2206)7    Sec. 6. State Reimbursement to Local Government For 8Increased Costs Arising From Certain Mandates. (a) Any 9increased costs accruing to local governments as a direct 10result of mandates dealing with the organization and structure 11of local government or due process mandates, as defined in 12subsections (c) and (d), respectively, of Section 3 above, are 13not reimbursable by the State.14    (b) At least 50%, but not more than 100% of the increase in 15costs of a local government directly attributable to a service 16mandate as defined in subsection (f) of Section 3 enacted by 17the General Assembly or established administratively after the 18effective date of this Act shall be reimbursed by the State 19unless there is in existence at the time of such enactment a 20program of State aid for the service affected by the mandate 21whereunder the non-local share for any participating local 22government is 50% or greater and where the increased costs 23arising under the mandate constitute allowable expenditures   SB1240- 2 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1under the aid program. Where all or part of the increased costs 2are met through federal or other external aid, only the net 3increase to the local government shall be included in the base 4against which the amount of State reimbursement is to be 5computed.6    (c) 100% of the loss in revenue of a local government 7directly attributable to a mandated classification or 8exemption of property for purposes of ad valorem real property 9taxation enacted after the effective date of this Act shall be 10reimbursed by the State. The loss of revenue does not include 11potential revenue from property of a type which was not being 12assessed and taxed on January 1, 1980.13    (d) Except for a State mandate that affects personnel 14qualifications for local employees, the salaries and wages of 15which are financed under a State program, and except as 16provided in subsection (e) below, any personnel mandate as 17defined in subsection (h) of Section 3 above enacted by the 18General Assembly or established administratively after the 19effective date of this Act shall be reimbursed by the State to 20the extent of increased costs incurred by local governments 21directly attributable to such mandate.22    (e) All of the increased costs of a local government 23directly attributable to a mandated increase in public 24employee retirement benefits which is enacted after the 25effective date of this Act and which has the effect of 26elevating retirement benefits of local government employees   SB1240- 3 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1shall be reimbursed by the State; except that any increased 2costs of a local government attributable to Public Act 83-152, 383-374, 83-375, 83-528, 83-558, 83-661, 83-664, 83-737, 483-772, 83-773, 83-780, 83-792, 83-793, 83-802, 83-810, 583-812, 83-823, 83-827 or 83-869 are not reimbursable by the 6State.7    (f) After the effective date of this Act, any bill filed 8and any amended bill that creates or enlarges a State mandate 9of the type specified in subsections (f), (g) and (h) of 10Section 3, shall have provided and identified for it an 11appropriation of an amount necessary to provide the 12reimbursement specified above unless a statement, stating the 13specific reasons for such exclusion is set out in the bill or 14amendment as provided in subsection (a) of Section 8.15    (g) If a local government or combination of local 16governments has been providing a service at its option which 17is subsequently mandated by the State, the State shall pay 18them for the subsequent costs of such program and the local 19government or governments shall proportionately reduce its or 20their property tax extensions by the amount that the State 21payment replaces property tax revenues which were being 22expended on such service. However, for purposes of calculating 23a school district's State aid, no district's operating tax 24rate shall be decreased as a result of reimbursement under 25this Act.26    (h) Any increased costs accruing to a local government as   SB1240- 4 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1a direct result of the requirements of the Steel Products 2Procurement Act are not reimbursable by the State.3    (i) The provisions of subsections (a) through (h) shall 4apply to State mandates enacted prior to the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. On and 6after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 7General Assembly, any State mandate enacted regarding any 8subject matter that necessitates additional expenditures from 9local government revenues shall be appropriated for and 10reimbursed as provided under Section 9.2. 11(Source: P.A. 83-1362.) 12    (30 ILCS 805/8)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2208)13    Sec. 8. Exclusions, reimbursement application, review, 14appeals, and adjudication.15    (a) Exclusions: Any of the following circumstances 16inherent to, or associated with, a mandate shall exclude the 17State from reimbursement liability under this Act. If the 18mandate (1) accommodates a request from local governments or 19organizations thereof; (2) imposes additional duties of a 20nature which can be carried out by existing staff and 21procedures at no appreciable net cost increase; (3) creates 22additional costs but also provides offsetting savings 23resulting in no aggregate increase in net costs; (4) imposes a 24cost that is wholly or largely recovered from Federal, State 25or other external financial aid; (5) imposes additional annual   SB1240- 5 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1net costs of less than $1,000 for each of the several local 2governments affected or less than $50,000, in the aggregate, 3for all local governments affected.4    The failure of the General Assembly to make necessary 5appropriations shall relieve the local government of the 6obligation to implement any service mandates, tax exemption 7mandates, and personnel mandates, as specified in Section 6, 8subsections (b), (c), (d) and (e), unless the exclusion 9provided for in this Section are explicitly stated in the Act 10establishing the mandate. In the event that funding is not 11provided for a State-mandated program by the General Assembly, 12the local government may implement or continue the program 13upon approval of its governing body. If the local government 14approves the program and funding is subsequently provided, the 15State shall reimburse the local governments only for costs 16incurred subsequent to the funding.17    (a-5) The provisions of subsection (a) excluding the State 18from reimbursement liability under this Act shall not apply to 19any State mandate enacted on or after the effective date of 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and all 21subsequent State mandates enacted shall be appropriated for 22and reimbursed as provided under Section 9.2. 23    (b) Reimbursement Estimation and Appropriation Procedure.24        (1) When a bill is introduced in the General Assembly, 25    the Legislative Reference Bureau, hereafter referred to as 26    the Bureau, shall determine whether such bill may require   SB1240- 6 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    reimbursement to local governments pursuant to this Act. 2    The Bureau shall make such determination known in the 3    Legislative Synopsis and Digest.4        In making the determination required by this 5    subsection (b) the Bureau shall disregard any provision in 6    a bill which would make inoperative the reimbursement 7    requirements of Section 6 above, including an express 8    exclusion of the applicability of this Act, and shall make 9    the determination irrespective of any such provision.10        (2) Any bill or amended bill which creates or expands 11    a State mandate shall be subject to the provisions of "An 12    Act requiring fiscal notes in relation to certain bills", 13    approved June 4, 1965, as amended. The fiscal notes for 14    such bills or amended bills shall include estimates of the 15    costs to local government and the costs of any 16    reimbursement required under this Act. In the case of 17    bills having a potential fiscal impact on units of local 18    government, the fiscal note shall be prepared by the 19    Department. In the case of bills having a potential fiscal 20    impact on school districts, the fiscal note shall be 21    prepared by the State Superintendent of Education. In the 22    case of bills having a potential fiscal impact on 23    community college districts, the fiscal note shall be 24    prepared by the Illinois Community College Board. Such 25    fiscal note shall accompany the bill that requires State 26    reimbursement and shall be prepared prior to any final   SB1240- 7 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    action on such a bill by the assigned committee. However, 2    if a fiscal note is not filed by the appropriate agency 3    within 30 days of introduction of a bill, the bill can be 4    heard in committee and advanced to the order of second 5    reading. The bill shall then remain on second reading 6    until a fiscal note is filed. A bill discharged from 7    committee shall also remain on second reading until a 8    fiscal note is provided by the appropriate agency.9        (3) The estimate required by paragraph (2) above, 10    shall include the amount estimated to be required during 11    the first fiscal year of a bill's operation in order to 12    reimburse local governments pursuant to Section 6, for 13    costs mandated by such bill. In the event that the 14    effective date of such a bill is not the first day of the 15    fiscal year the estimate shall also include the amount 16    estimated to be required for reimbursement for the next 17    following full fiscal year. 18        (4) For the initial fiscal year, reimbursement funds 19    shall be provided as follows: (i) any statute mandating 20    such costs shall have a companion appropriation bill, and 21    (ii) any executive order mandating such costs shall be 22    accompanied by a bill to appropriate the funds therefor, 23    or, alternatively an appropriation for such funds shall be 24    included in the executive budget for the next following 25    fiscal year.26        In subsequent fiscal years appropriations for such   SB1240- 8 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    costs shall be included in the Governor's budget or 2    supplemental appropriation bills.3    (c) Reimbursement Application and Disbursement Procedure.4        (1) For the initial fiscal year during which 5    reimbursement is authorized, each local government, or 6    more than one local government wishing to join in filing a 7    single claim, believing itself to be entitled to 8    reimbursement under this Act shall submit to the 9    Department, State Superintendent of Education or Illinois 10    Community College Board within 60 days of the effective 11    date of the mandate a claim for reimbursement accompanied 12    by its estimate of the increased costs required by the 13    mandate for the balance of the fiscal year. The 14    Department, State Superintendent of Education or Illinois 15    Community College Board shall review such claim and 16    estimate, shall apportion the claim into 3 equal 17    installments and shall direct the Comptroller to pay the 18    installments at equal intervals throughout the remainder 19    of the fiscal year from the funds appropriated for such 20    purposes, provided that the Department, State 21    Superintendent of Education or Illinois Community College 22    Board may (i) audit the records of any local government to 23    verify the actual amount of the mandated cost, and (ii) 24    reduce any claim determined to be excessive or 25    unreasonable.26        (2) For the subsequent fiscal years, local governments   SB1240- 9 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    shall submit claims as specified above on or before 2    October 1 of each year. The Department, State 3    Superintendent of Education or Illinois Community College 4    Board shall apportion the claims into 3 equal installments 5    and shall direct the Comptroller to pay the first 6    installment upon approval of the claims, with subsequent 7    installments to follow on January 1 and March 1, such 8    claims to be paid from funds appropriated therefor, 9    provided that the Department, State Superintendent of 10    Education or Illinois Community College Board (i) may 11    audit the records of any local governments to verify the 12    actual amount of the mandated cost, (ii) may reduce any 13    claim, determined to be excessive or unreasonable, and 14    (iii) shall adjust the payment to correct for any 15    underpayments or overpayments which occurred in the 16    previous fiscal year.17        (3) Any funds received by a local government pursuant 18    to this Act may be used for any public purpose.19        If the funds appropriated for reimbursement of the 20    costs of local government resulting from the creation or 21    expansion of a State mandate are less than the total of the 22    approved claims, the amount appropriated shall be prorated 23    among the local governments having approved claims.24    (d) Appeals and Adjudication.25        (1) Local governments may appeal determinations made 26    by State agencies acting pursuant to subsection (c) above.   SB1240- 10 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    The appeal must be submitted to the State Mandates Board 2    of Review created by Section 9.1 of this Act within 60 days 3    following the date of receipt of the determination being 4    appealed. The appeal must include evidence as to the 5    extent to which the mandate has been carried out in an 6    effective manner and executed without recourse to 7    standards of staffing or expenditure higher than specified 8    in the mandatory statute, if such standards are specified 9    in the statute. The State Mandates Board of Review, after 10    reviewing the evidence submitted to it, may increase or 11    reduce the amount of a reimbursement claim. The decision 12    of the State Mandates Board of Review shall be final 13    subject to judicial review. However, if sufficient funds 14    have not been appropriated, the Department shall notify 15    the General Assembly of such cost, and appropriations for 16    such costs shall be included in a supplemental 17    appropriation bill.18        (2) A local government may also appeal directly to the 19    State Mandates Board of Review in those situations in 20    which the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 21    does not act upon the local government's application for 22    reimbursement or request for mandate determination 23    submitted under this Act. The appeal must include evidence 24    that the application for reimbursement or request for 25    mandate determination was properly filed and should have 26    been reviewed by the Department.  SB1240- 11 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1        An appeal may be made to the Board if the Department 2    does not respond to a local government's application for 3    reimbursement or request for mandate determination within 4    120 days after filing the application or request. In no 5    case, however, may an appeal be brought more than one year 6    after the application or request is filed with the 7    Department.8(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 9    (30 ILCS 805/9.2 new)10    Sec. 9.2. Unfunded State mandates prohibited. 11Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any 12State mandate regarding any subject matter enacted on or after 13the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly that necessitates additional expenditures from local 15government revenues shall be void and unenforceable unless the 16General Assembly makes necessary appropriations and 17reimbursements to implement that mandate. The failure of the 18General Assembly to make necessary appropriations and 19reimbursements shall relieve the local government of the 20obligation to implement any State mandate. 21    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 22changing Section 901 as follows: 23    (35 ILCS 5/901)  SB1240- 12 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    Sec. 901. Collection authority. 2    (a) In general. The Department shall collect the taxes 3imposed by this Act. The Department shall collect certified 4past due child support amounts under Section 2505-650 of the 5Department of Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois. Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (e), 7(f), (g), and (h) of this Section, money collected pursuant to 8subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act shall be 9paid into the General Revenue Fund in the State treasury; 10money collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 11201 of this Act shall be paid into the Personal Property Tax 12Replacement Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury; and 13money collected under Section 2505-650 of the Department of 14Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois shall 15be paid into the Child Support Enforcement Trust Fund, a 16special fund outside the State Treasury, or to the State 17Disbursement Unit established under Section 10-26 of the 18Illinois Public Aid Code, as directed by the Department of 19Healthcare and Family Services.20    (b) Local Government Distributive Fund. Beginning August 211, 2017 and continuing through July 31, 2022, the Treasurer 22shall transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the 23Local Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum 24of: (i) 6.06% (10% of the ratio of the 3% individual income tax 25rate prior to 2011 to the 4.95% individual income tax rate 26after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the tax   SB1240- 13 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 2upon individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding 3month; (ii) 6.85% (10% of the ratio of the 4.8% corporate 4income tax rate prior to 2011 to the 7% corporate income tax 5rate after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the 6tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 7Act upon corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 8beginning February 1, 2022, 6.06% of the net revenue realized 9from the tax imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 of this 10Act upon electing pass-through entities. From Beginning August 111, 2022 and continuing through July 31, 2025 2023, the 12Treasurer shall transfer each month from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Local Government Distributive Fund an amount equal 14to the sum of: (i) 6.16% of the net revenue realized from the 15tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 16Act upon individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding 17month; (ii) 6.85% of the net revenue realized from the tax 18imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 19upon corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 6.16% 20of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsection 21(p) of Section 201 of this Act upon electing pass-through 22entities. From August 1, 2025 through July 31, 2026, the 23Treasurer shall transfer each month from the General Revenue 24Fund to the Local Government Distributive Fund an amount equal 25to the sum of: (i) 7% of the net revenue realized from the tax 26imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act   SB1240- 14 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1upon individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding 2month; (ii) 8.11% of the net revenue realized from the tax 3imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 4upon corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 7% of 5the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsection 6(p) of Section 201 of this Act upon electing pass-through 7entities. Beginning on August 1, 2026, the Treasurer shall 8transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the Local 9Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum of: 10(i) 8% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by 11subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 12individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding month; 13(ii) 9.11% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 15corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 8% of the 16net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsection (p) of 17Section 201 of this Act upon electing pass-through entities. 18Beginning August 1, 2023, the Treasurer shall transfer each 19month from the General Revenue Fund to the Local Government 20Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum of: (i) 6.47% of 21the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsections 22(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon individuals, 23trusts, and estates during the preceding month; (ii) 6.85% of 24the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsections 25(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon corporations during 26the preceding month; and (iii) 6.47% of the net revenue   SB1240- 15 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1realized from the tax imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 2of this Act upon electing pass-through entities. Net revenue 3realized for a month shall be defined as the revenue from the 4tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 5Act which is deposited into the General Revenue Fund, the 6Education Assistance Fund, the Income Tax Surcharge Local 7Government Distributive Fund, the Fund for the Advancement of 8Education, and the Commitment to Human Services Fund during 9the month minus the amount paid out of the General Revenue Fund 10in State warrants during that same month as refunds to 11taxpayers for overpayment of liability under the tax imposed 12by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act.13    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 14beginning on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 15100-23), those amounts required under this subsection (b) to 16be transferred by the Treasurer into the Local Government 17Distributive Fund from the General Revenue Fund shall be 18directly deposited into the Local Government Distributive Fund 19as the revenue is realized from the tax imposed by subsections 20(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act.21    (c) Deposits Into Income Tax Refund Fund.22        (1) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 23    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts 24    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and 25    (3) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in the State 26    treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. Beginning   SB1240- 16 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal year 2    thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income Tax 3    Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 4    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 5    shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual 6    Percentage shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2013, the 7    Annual Percentage shall be 9.75%. For fiscal year 2014, 8    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2015, 9    the Annual Percentage shall be 10%. For fiscal year 2018, 10    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.8%. For fiscal year 2019, 11    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.7%. For fiscal year 2020, 12    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2021, 13    the Annual Percentage shall be 9%. For fiscal year 2022, 14    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal year 15    2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal 16    year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. For 17    fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. 18    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 19    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 20    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 21    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 22    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 23    (b)(1), (2), and (3) of Section 201 of this Act plus the 24    amount of such refunds remaining approved but unpaid at 25    the end of the preceding fiscal year, minus the amounts 26    transferred into the Income Tax Refund Fund from the   SB1240- 17 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund, and the denominator of 2    which shall be the amounts which will be collected 3    pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and (3) of 4    Section 201 of this Act during the preceding fiscal year; 5    except that in State fiscal year 2002, the Annual 6    Percentage shall in no event exceed 7.6%. The Director of 7    Revenue shall certify the Annual Percentage to the 8    Comptroller on the last business day of the fiscal year 9    immediately preceding the fiscal year for which it is to 10    be effective.11        (2) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 12    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts 13    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 14    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in 15    the State treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. 16    Beginning with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal 17    year thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income 18    Tax Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 19    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 20    shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual 21    Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2013, the 22    Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2014, the 23    Annual Percentage shall be 13.4%. For fiscal year 2015, 24    the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2018, 25    the Annual Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 26    2019, the Annual Percentage shall be 15.5%. For fiscal   SB1240- 18 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    year 2020, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.25%. For 2    fiscal year 2021, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For 3    fiscal year 2022, the Annual Percentage shall be 15%. For 4    fiscal year 2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.5%. 5    For fiscal year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. 6    For fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. 7    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 8    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 9    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 10    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 11    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 12    (b)(6), (7), and (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this 13    Act plus the amount of such refunds remaining approved but 14    unpaid at the end of the preceding fiscal year, and the 15    denominator of which shall be the amounts which will be 16    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 17    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act during the 18    preceding fiscal year; except that in State fiscal year 19    2002, the Annual Percentage shall in no event exceed 23%. 20    The Director of Revenue shall certify the Annual 21    Percentage to the Comptroller on the last business day of 22    the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year for 23    which it is to be effective.24        (3) The Comptroller shall order transferred and the 25    Treasurer shall transfer from the Tobacco Settlement 26    Recovery Fund to the Income Tax Refund Fund (i)   SB1240- 19 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    $35,000,000 in January, 2001, (ii) $35,000,000 in January, 2    2002, and (iii) $35,000,000 in January, 2003.3    (d) Expenditures from Income Tax Refund Fund.4        (1) Beginning January 1, 1989, money in the Income Tax 5    Refund Fund shall be expended exclusively for the purpose 6    of paying refunds resulting from overpayment of tax 7    liability under Section 201 of this Act and for making 8    transfers pursuant to this subsection (d), except that in 9    State fiscal years 2022 and 2023, moneys in the Income Tax 10    Refund Fund shall also be used to pay one-time rebate 11    payments as provided under Sections 208.5 and 212.1.12        (2) The Director shall order payment of refunds 13    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under Section 14    201 of this Act from the Income Tax Refund Fund only to the 15    extent that amounts collected pursuant to Section 201 of 16    this Act and transfers pursuant to this subsection (d) and 17    item (3) of subsection (c) have been deposited and 18    retained in the Fund.19        (3) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal 20    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 21    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 22    Income Tax Refund Fund to the Personal Property Tax 23    Replacement Fund an amount, certified by the Director to 24    the Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount 25    collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 26    201 of this Act deposited into the Income Tax Refund Fund   SB1240- 20 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    during the fiscal year over the amount of refunds 2    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 3    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid 4    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.5        (4) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal 6    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 7    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 8    Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Income Tax 9    Refund Fund an amount, certified by the Director to the 10    Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount of refunds 11    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 12    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid 13    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year 14    over the amount collected pursuant to subsections (c) and 15    (d) of Section 201 of this Act deposited into the Income 16    Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.17        (4.5) As soon as possible after the end of fiscal year 18    1999 and of each fiscal year thereafter, the Director 19    shall order transferred and the State Treasurer and State 20    Comptroller shall transfer from the Income Tax Refund Fund 21    to the General Revenue Fund any surplus remaining in the 22    Income Tax Refund Fund as of the end of such fiscal year; 23    excluding for fiscal years 2000, 2001, and 2002 amounts 24    attributable to transfers under item (3) of subsection (c) 25    less refunds resulting from the earned income tax credit, 26    and excluding for fiscal year 2022 amounts attributable to   SB1240- 21 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    transfers from the General Revenue Fund authorized by 2    Public Act 102-700.3        (5) This Act shall constitute an irrevocable and 4    continuing appropriation from the Income Tax Refund Fund 5    for the purposes of (i) paying refunds upon the order of 6    the Director in accordance with the provisions of this 7    Section and (ii) paying one-time rebate payments under 8    Sections 208.5 and 212.1.9    (e) Deposits into the Education Assistance Fund and the 10Income Tax Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund. On 11July 1, 1991, and thereafter, of the amounts collected 12pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, 13minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department 14shall deposit 7.3% into the Education Assistance Fund in the 15State Treasury. Beginning July 1, 1991, and continuing through 16January 31, 1993, of the amounts collected pursuant to 17subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 18Tax Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 19Department shall deposit 3.0% into the Income Tax Surcharge 20Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. 21Beginning February 1, 1993 and continuing through June 30, 221993, of the amounts collected pursuant to subsections (a) and 23(b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, minus 24deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department shall 25deposit 4.4% into the Income Tax Surcharge Local Government 26Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. Beginning July 1,   SB1240- 22 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b11993, and continuing through June 30, 1994, of the amounts 2collected under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 3Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 4Department shall deposit 1.475% into the Income Tax Surcharge 5Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury.6    (f) Deposits into the Fund for the Advancement of 7Education. Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall 8deposit the following portions of the revenue realized from 9the tax imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by 10subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus 11deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Fund for the 12Advancement of Education: 13        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 14    1, 2025, 1/30; and 15        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 16    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of 17Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 18the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 19subsection (f) on or after the effective date of the 20reduction. 21    (g) Deposits into the Commitment to Human Services Fund. 22Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall deposit the 23following portions of the revenue realized from the tax 24imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by subsections 25(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus deposits into the 26Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Commitment to Human Services   SB1240- 23 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1Fund: 2        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 3    1, 2025, 1/30; and 4        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 5    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of 6Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 7the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 8subsection (g) on or after the effective date of the 9reduction. 10    (h) Deposits into the Tax Compliance and Administration 11Fund. Beginning on the first day of the first calendar month to 12occur on or after August 26, 2014 (the effective date of Public 13Act 98-1098), each month the Department shall pay into the Tax 14Compliance and Administration Fund, to be used, subject to 15appropriation, to fund additional auditors and compliance 16personnel at the Department, an amount equal to 1/12 of 5% of 17the cash receipts collected during the preceding fiscal year 18by the Audit Bureau of the Department from the tax imposed by 19subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 201 of this Act, 20net of deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund made from those 21cash receipts. 22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, eff. 244-19-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, 25eff. 6-30-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.)   SB1240- 24 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    Section 15. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 2Sections 18-185, 18-205, and 18-212 and by adding Section 318-207 as follows: 4    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)5    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 6may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 7used in this Division 5: 8    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 9All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 10States Department of Labor. 11    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable years prior to 122026: (a) the lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the 13Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 14preceding the levy year; or (b) the rate of increase approved 15by voters under Section 18-205. 16    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable year 2026 and 17thereafter: (a) the lesser of 5% or the average percentage 18increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 10 years 19immediately preceding the levy year for which the extension 20limitation is being calculated; or (b) the rate of increase 21approved by voters under Section 18-205. 22    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 23inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 24more inhabitants. 25    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section   SB1240- 25 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b11-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 21991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 3only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of 4its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 5counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 6inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 7district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 8subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 9rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 10levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 11value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 12levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 13district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 14includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 15provided in Section 18-213. 16    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 17Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 18corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 19purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 20district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 21the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 22obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 23for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 24general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 25made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 26bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds   SB1240- 26 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 2district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 3refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1, 41991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 5district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 6before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 7or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 8pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 9principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 10governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 11other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 12payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 13lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 14issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 15building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 16contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 17payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 18Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 19construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 20made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 21as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 22Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 23less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 24definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 25initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 26of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of   SB1240- 27 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 2district that participates in the Special Education District 3of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement 4under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 5school district's share of the amounts required to be 6contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 7to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 8the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 9this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 10county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 11recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 12Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 13the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 14loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1517-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 16and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 17Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 18to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 19Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 20under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 21(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 22assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 23liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 24district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 25the Illinois Highway Code; and (q) made under Section 4 of the 26Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or   SB1240- 28 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1to supplement existing funds for community mental health 2facilities and services, including facilities and services for 3the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 4disorder; and (r) (q) made for the payment of principal and 5interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 617-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 7those bonds. 8    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 9this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 10districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 1118-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 12district and those special purpose extensions that are made 13annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 14extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 15or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 16referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 17or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 181, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 19principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 20those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 21taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 22to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 231995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 24district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 25before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 26or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is   SB1240- 29 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 2principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 3governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 4other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 5payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 6lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 7issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 8building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 9contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 10payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 11Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 12construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 13made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 14Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 15of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 16for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 17Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 18Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 19under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 20payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 21defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 22in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 23the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 24non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 25issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 26subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for   SB1240- 30 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 2Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 3for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by 4Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 5Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 6issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 7the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 8established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 9made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 10authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 11pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 12District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 13Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 14(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 15Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 16pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 17annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 18recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 19Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 20the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 21District for recreational programs for persons with 22disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 23Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 24firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 25Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 26under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code;   SB1240- 31 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 217-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 3employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension 4and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 5School Code; and (s) made under Section 4 of the Community 6Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to 7supplement existing funds for community mental health 8facilities and services, including facilities and services for 9the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 10disorder; and (t) (s) made for the payment of principal and 11interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1217-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 13those bonds. 14    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 15this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 16those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 17(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 18for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 19that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 20special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 21to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 22were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 23to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 24issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 25applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 26taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued   SB1240- 32 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 2date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 3taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 4pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 5continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 6referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 7is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 8on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 9taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 10pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 11date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 12taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 13levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 14government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 15interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 16the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 17all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 18payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 19lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 20issued by the commission before the date on which the 21referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 22is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 23due under installment contracts entered into before the date 24on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 25taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 26and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the   SB1240- 33 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 2the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 3(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 4obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 5referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 6bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 7Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 8interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 9the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 10airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 11installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 12before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 13a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 14fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 15persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 16District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 17Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 18fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 19the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 204-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 21district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 22bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 23and (n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act 24to provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 25for community mental health facilities and services, including 26facilities and services for the person with a developmental   SB1240- 34 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) (n) made for 2the payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued 3under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 4refund or continue to refund those bonds. 5    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 6this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 7subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 8extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 9extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 10excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 11district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 12bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 13taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 14obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 15date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 16pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 17continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 18(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 19taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 20to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 211997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 22were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 23date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 24pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 257, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 26of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of   SB1240- 35 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 2payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 3only after the governing body of the unit of local government 4finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 5make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 6commission lease when the lease payments are for the 7retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 81997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 9building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 10contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 11date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 12and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 13Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 14the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 15(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 16obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 17referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 18bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 19Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 20interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 21the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 22airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 23installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 24before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 25a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 26fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for   SB1240- 36 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 2District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 3Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 4fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 5the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 64-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (m) made under Section 74 of the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary 8funds or to supplement existing funds for community mental 9health facilities and services, including facilities and 10services for the person with a developmental disability or a 11substance use disorder; and (n) (m) made for the payment of 12principal and interest on any bonds issued under the authority 13of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue 14to refund those bonds. 15    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 16that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 171994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 18Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 19subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 20for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 21applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 22districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 23of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 24constituting an extension for payment of principal and 25interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 26referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds.   SB1240- 37 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 21991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 3for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 4the park district without referendum (but not including 5excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 6for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 7of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 8without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 9bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 10that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 11constituting an extension for payment of principal and 12interest on bonds issued by the park district without 13referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 14A debt service extension base established or increased at any 15time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 1618-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 17of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 18this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 19extension limitation lesser of 5% or the percentage increase 20in the Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 21preceding the levy year. The debt service extension base may 22be established or increased as provided under Section 18-212. 23"Excluded non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by 24Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 25Park District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 26issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform   SB1240- 38 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 2continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 3referendum. 4    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 5to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 6unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 7contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 8to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 9district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 10The extension for a special service area is not included in the 11aggregate extension. 12    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 13last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1418-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 15levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 16Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 17base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 18adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 19levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 20counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 21estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 22taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 23in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 24decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 25as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 26required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of   SB1240- 39 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 2aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 3the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 4rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 5calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 6(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 7been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.8    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 92012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 10District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 11    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 12purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 13the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 14School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 162022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 17program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 18levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 19shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 20base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 21levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 22    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 231-155. 24    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 25board of review or board of appeals action, of new 26improvements or additions to existing improvements on any   SB1240- 40 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 2that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 3equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 417-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 5board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 6estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 7estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 8levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 9Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 10upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 11is complete, of any real property located within the 12boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 13reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 14or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 15counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 16IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 17additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 18in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 19board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 20assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 21well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 22Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 23during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 24in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 25include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 26school district, any recovered tax increment value that was   SB1240- 41 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 2    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 3organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 4county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 5population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 6    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 7provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 8equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 9municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 10redevelopment project area previously established under the 11Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 12Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 13Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 14established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 15Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 16Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 17each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 18the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 19equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 20project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 21levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 22rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 23the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 24assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 25increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 26area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously   SB1240- 42 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 2Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 3under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 4Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 5Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 6equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 7lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 8redevelopment project area over and above the initial 9equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 10project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 11taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 12redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 13Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 14the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 15Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 16Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 17amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 18taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 19from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 20equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 21from the redevelopment project area. 22    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 23rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 24preceding aggregate extension base (as reduced by Section 2518-207, if applicable) times an amount equal to one plus the 26extension limitation defined in this Section and the   SB1240- 43 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1denominator of which is the current year's equalized assessed 2value of all real property in the territory under the 3jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 4year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 5extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 6districts that reduced their extension for educational 7purposes pursuant to Section 18-206 and taxing districts that 8reduced their aggregate extension pursuant to Section 18-207, 9the highest aggregate extension in any of the last 3 preceding 10levy years shall be used for the purpose of computing the 11limiting rate. The denominator shall not include new property 12or the recovered tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate 13decrease, or a limiting rate increase has been approved at an 14election held after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise 15applicable limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of 16the new rate or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate 17decrease, as the case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting 18rate increase, the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set 19forth in the proposition approved by the voters for each of the 20years specified in the proposition, after which the limiting 21rate of the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise 22provided. In the case of a taxing district that obtained 23referendum approval for an increased limiting rate on March 2420, 2012, the limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate 25that generates the approximate total amount of taxes 26extendable for that tax year, as set forth in the proposition   SB1240- 44 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1approved by the voters; this rate shall be the final rate 2applied by the county clerk for the aggregate of all capped 3funds of the district for tax year 2012.4(Source: P.A. 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-311, eff. 8-6-21; 5102-519, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-707, eff. 64-22-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 7103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 103-591, eff. 87-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; revised 7-9-24.) 9    (35 ILCS 200/18-205)10    Sec. 18-205. Referendum to increase the extension 11limitation. A taxing district is limited to an extension 12limitation as defined in Section 18-185 of 5% or the 13percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1412-month calendar year preceding the levy year, whichever is 15less. A taxing district may increase its extension limitation 16for one or more levy years if that taxing district holds a 17referendum before the levy date for the first levy year at 18which a majority of voters voting on the issue approves 19adoption of a higher extension limitation. Referenda shall be 20conducted at a regularly scheduled election in accordance with 21the Election Code. The question shall be presented in 22substantially the following manner for all elections held 23after March 21, 2006:24        Shall the extension limitation under the Property Tax 25    Extension Limitation Law for (insert the legal name,   SB1240- 45 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    number, if any, and county or counties of the taxing 2    district and geographic or other common name by which a 3    school or community college district is known and referred 4    to), Illinois, be increased from (the extension limitation 5    under item (a) of the definition of extension limitation 6    in Section 18-185) the lesser of 5% or the percentage 7    increase in the Consumer Price Index over the prior levy 8    year to (insert the percentage of the proposed increase)% 9    per year for (insert each levy year for which the 10    increased extension limitation will apply)?11The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 12If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 13adoption of the increase, the increase shall be applicable for 14each levy year specified.15    The ballot for any question submitted pursuant to this 16Section shall have printed thereon, but not as a part of the 17question submitted, only the following supplemental 18information (which shall be supplied to the election authority 19by the taxing district) in substantially the following form:20        (1) For the (insert the first levy year for which the 21    increased extension limitation will be applicable) levy 22    year the approximate amount of the additional tax 23    extendable against property containing a single family 24    residence and having a fair market value at the time of the 25    referendum of $100,000 is estimated to be $....26        (2) Based upon an average annual percentage increase   SB1240- 46 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1    (or decrease) in the market value of such property of ...% 2    (insert percentage equal to the average annual percentage 3    increase or decrease for the prior 3 levy years, at the 4    time the submission of the question is initiated by the 5    taxing district, in the amount of (A) the equalized 6    assessed value of the taxable property in the taxing 7    district less (B) the new property included in the 8    equalized assessed value), the approximate amount of the 9    additional tax extendable against such property for the 10    ... levy year is estimated to be $... and for the ... levy 11    year is estimated to be $....12    Paragraph (2) shall be included only if the increased 13extension limitation will be applicable for more than one year 14and shall list each levy year for which the increased 15extension limitation will be applicable. The additional tax 16shown for each levy year shall be the approximate dollar 17amount of the increase over the amount of the most recently 18completed extension at the time the submission of the question 19is initiated by the taxing district. The approximate amount of 20the additional tax extendable shown in paragraphs (1) and (2) 21shall be calculated by multiplying $100,000 (the fair market 22value of the property without regard to any property tax 23exemptions) by (i) the percentage level of assessment 24prescribed for that property by statute, or by ordinance of 25the county board in counties that classify property for 26purposes of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article   SB1240- 47 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1IX of the Illinois Constitution; (ii) the most recent final 2equalization factor certified to the county clerk by the 3Department of Revenue at the time the taxing district 4initiates the submission of the proposition to the electors; 5(iii) the last known aggregate extension base of the taxing 6district at the time the submission of the question is 7initiated by the taxing district; and (iv) the difference 8between the percentage increase proposed in the question and 9the otherwise applicable extension limitation lesser of 5% or 10the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 11prior levy year (or an estimate of the percentage increase for 12the prior levy year if the increase is unavailable at the time 13the submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 14district); and dividing the result by the last known equalized 15assessed value of the taxing district at the time the 16submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 17district. This amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly is 18intended to clarify the existing requirements of this Section, 19and shall not be construed to validate any prior non-compliant 20referendum language. Any notice required to be published in 21connection with the submission of the question shall also 22contain this supplemental information and shall not contain 23any other supplemental information. Any error, miscalculation, 24or inaccuracy in computing any amount set forth on the ballot 25or in the notice that is not deliberate shall not invalidate or 26affect the validity of any proposition approved. Notice of the   SB1240- 48 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1referendum shall be published and posted as otherwise required 2by law, and the submission of the question shall be initiated 3as provided by law. 4(Source: P.A. 97-1087, eff. 8-24-12.) 5    (35 ILCS 200/18-207 new)6    Sec. 18-207. Reduced aggregate extension base.7    (a) Upon submission of a petition signed by a number of 8voters of the taxing district that is not less than 10% of the 9votes cast in the taxing district at the immediately preceding 10gubernatorial election, the question of whether a taxing 11district shall reduce its aggregate extension base for the 12purpose of lowering its limiting rate for future years shall 13be submitted to the voters of the taxing district at the next 14general or consolidated election. The petition shall set forth 15the amount of the reduction and the levy years for which the 16reduction shall be applicable. 17    (b) The petition shall be filed with the applicable 18election authority, as defined in Section 1-3 of the Election 19Code, or, in the case of multiple election authorities, with 20the State Board of Elections, not more than 10 months nor less 21than 6 months prior to the election at which the question is to 22be submitted to the voters, and its validity shall be 23determined as provided by Article 28 of the Election Code and 24general election law. The election authority or Board, as 25applicable, shall certify the question and the proper election   SB1240- 49 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1authority or authorities shall submit the question to the 2voters. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, this 3referendum shall be subject to all other general election law 4requirements. 5    (c) The proposition seeking to reduce the aggregate 6extension base shall be in substantially the following form: 7        Shall the aggregate extension base used to calculate 8    the limiting rate for (taxing district) under the Property 9    Tax Extension Limitation Law be reduced by (amount of 10    money expressed in U.S. dollars) for (levy year or years)? 11    Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 12    If a majority of all votes cast on the proposition are in 13favor of the proposition, then the aggregate extension base 14shall be reduced as provided in the referendum.  15    (35 ILCS 200/18-212)16    Sec. 18-212. Referendum on debt service extension base. A 17taxing district may establish or increase its debt service 18extension base if (i) that taxing district holds a referendum 19before the date on which the levy must be filed with the county 20clerk of the county or counties in which the taxing district is 21situated and (ii) a majority of voters voting on the issue 22approves the establishment of or increase in the debt service 23extension base. A debt service extension base established or 24increased by a referendum held pursuant to this Section after 25February 2, 2010, shall be increased each year, commencing   SB1240- 50 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1with the first levy year beginning after the date of the 2referendum, by the extension limitation lesser of 5% or the 3percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 412-month calendar year preceding the levy year if the optional 5language concerning the annual increase is included in the 6question submitted to the electors of the taxing district. 7Referenda under this Section shall be conducted at a regularly 8scheduled election in accordance with the Election Code. The 9governing body of the taxing district shall certify the 10question to the proper election authorities who shall submit 11the question to the electors of the taxing district in 12substantially the following form: 13    "Shall the debt service extension base under the Property 14    Tax Extension Limitation Law for ... (taxing district 15    name) ... for payment of principal and interest on limited 16    bonds be .... ((established at $ ....) . (or) (increased 17    from $ .... to $ ....)) .. for the ..... levy year and all 18    subsequent levy years (optional language: , such debt 19    service extension base to be increased each year by 20    (extension limitation amount) the lesser of 5% or the 21    percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 22    12-month calendar year preceding the levy year)?"23    Votes on the question shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".24    If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 25establishment of or increase in the debt service extension 26base, the establishment of or increase in the debt service   SB1240- 51 -LRB104 03795 HLH 13819 b1extension base shall be applicable for the levy years 2specified.3(Source: P.A. 96-1202, eff. 7-22-10.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.